Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1404
Administrative action, defined.

Administrative action shall mean any decision on, or proposal, consideration, enactment, or defeat of any rule, regulation, or other official policy action or nonaction by any executive agency, or any policy matter which is within the official jurisdiction of an executive agency.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 4.